Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.0931

Death benefit—Course of employment as a police officer—Occupational disease or infection.

(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit for members who had the opportunity to transfer to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system pursuant to chapter 502, Laws of 1993, but elected to remain in the public employees' retirement system, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, the member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representatives.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result of (a) injuries sustained in the course of employment as a general authority police officer; or (b) an occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

(3) The benefit under this section shall not be paid in the event the member was in the act of committing a felony when the fatal injuries were suffered.

[ 2007 c 487 s 6; 1998 c 157 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 157: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 25, 1998]." [ 1998 c 157 s 6.]